test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-14herneh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - herneh: # Noun (14) herneh 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     herneh+N+Sg+Nom: herneh
     herneh+N+Sg+Gen: herne
     herneh+N+Sg+Par: herneht
     herneh+N+Sg+Ill: [hernehe, hernede]
     herneh+N+Sg+Ine: [hernen, herneh, hernehn]
     herneh+N+Sg+Ela: hernest
     herneh+N+Sg+All: hernele
     herneh+N+Sg+Ade: hernel
     herneh+N+Sg+Abl: hernelt
     herneh+N+Sg+Tra: hernes
     herneh+N+Sg+Ter: herneniq
     herneh+N+Sg+Abe: herneldäq
     herneh+N+Sg+Com: hernegaq
     herneh+N+Pl+Nom: herneq
     herneh+N+Pl+Gen: [hernide, herniide, hernehte]
     herneh+N+Pl+Par: [hernit, herniid]
     herneh+N+Pl+Ill: [hernihe, herniihe, hernide, herniide, hernehtehe, hernehtede]
     herneh+N+Pl+Ine: [hernin, herniin, hernih, herniih, hernihn, herniihn, hernehten, hernehteh, hernehtehn]
     herneh+N+Pl+Ela: [hernist, herniist, hernehtest]
     herneh+N+Pl+All: [hernile, herniile, hernehtele]
     herneh+N+Pl+Ade: [hernil, herniil, hernehtel]
     herneh+N+Pl+Abl: [hernilt, herniilt, hernehtelt]
     herneh+N+Pl+Tra: [hernis, herniis, hernehtes]
     herneh+N+Pl+Ter: [herniniq, herniiniq, hernehteniq]
     herneh+N+Pl+Abe: [hernildäq, herniildäq, hernehteldäq]
     herneh+N+Pl+Com: [hernidegaq, herniidegaq, hernehtegaq]
